Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.759

DNA identification system—Rule-making requirements.

The Washington state patrol shall consult with the forensic investigations council and adopt rules to implement RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758. The rules shall prohibit the use of DNA identification data for any research or other purpose that is not related to a criminal investigation, to the identification of human remains or missing persons, or to improving the operation of the system authorized by RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758. The rules must also identify appropriate sources and collection methods for biological samples needed for purposes of DNA identification analysis.

[ 2002 c 289 s 3; 1990 c 230 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 289: See notes following RCW 43.43.753.